Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF7.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1041XS (2) 91 sb/js S.F. 7 Section 1. Section 483A.6A, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. A Except for a nonresident qualified under section 3 483A.24, subsection 16, paragraph âbâ , a nonresident fishing 4 for paddlefish on the Missouri or Big Sioux river is required 5 to have a fishing license that is valid in Iowa and, in 6 addition, purchase a nonresident paddlefish fishing license. 7 Sec. 2. Section 483A.24, subsection 16, Code 2025, is 8 amended to read as follows: 9 16. a. Upon payment of the fee established by rules adopted 10 pursuant to section 483A.1 for a lifetime fishing license or 11 lifetime hunting and fishing combined license, the department 12 shall issue a lifetime fishing license or lifetime hunting and 13 fishing combined license to a resident of Iowa who has served 14 in the armed forces of the United States on federal active 15 duty and who was disabled or was a prisoner of war during that 16 veteranâs military service. The department shall prepare 17 an application to be used by a person requesting a lifetime 18 fishing license or lifetime hunting and fishing combined 19 license under this subsection . The department of veterans 20 affairs shall assist the department in verifying the status or 21 claims of applicants under this subsection . As used in this 22 subsection , âdisabledâ means entitled to a service connected 23 rating under 38 U.S.C. ch. 11. 24 b. A person, regardless of whether the person is a resident, 25 may fish without acquiring a fishing license if that person 26 has served in the armed forces of the United States on federal 27 active duty and was disabled during that veteranâs military 28 service, as verified by the department of veterans affairs. 29 While fishing pursuant to this paragraph, the person shall, 30 upon request of a peace officer, display proof of the personâs 31 veteran status and disability status in the same manner and 32 subject to the same procedures and penalties as provided by 33 section 483A.19. 34 EXPLANATION 35 -1- LSB 1041XS (2) 91 sb/js 1/ 2 S.F. 7 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 1 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 2 This bill relates to fishing privileges for disabled 3 veterans. Under current law, a resident who served in the 4 armed forces of the United States on federal active duty and 5 who was disabled during that veteranâs military service is 6 eligible to obtain a lifetime fishing license or lifetime 7 hunting and fishing combined license. 8 Under the bill, any person, regardless of whether the person 9 is a resident, who is a disabled veteran may fish without 10 acquiring a fishing license if the personâs disability occurred 11 during the veteranâs military service. A person fishing in 12 such manner shall, upon request of a peace officer, display 13 proof of the personâs veteran status and disability status. 14 A person who fails to provide the necessary documentation 15 is guilty of a simple misdemeanor punishable as a scheduled 16 violation with a fine of $35. A person charged with failing to 17 produce the necessary documentation may avoid conviction if the 18 person produces in court, within a reasonable time, proof of 19 the personâs veteran and disability status. 20 The bill also makes a conforming change to the Code section 21 concerning nonresident paddlefish fishing licenses and tags. 22 -2- LSB 1041XS (2) 91 sb/js 2/ 2